Connecticut, session 2026, HB05230.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 8-345 of the general statutes be amended to direct the
Commissioner of Housing to exempt income of up to one hundred
thousand dollars earned by a child under the age of twenty-four living
with a parent from the parent's gross income for the purpose of
determining such parent's eligibility for participation in the rental
assistance program, and that appropriations for the rental assistance
program be changed accordingly.